Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-119
Signing of records to be delivered
for filing to Secretary of State.

(RULLCA 203) (a) A record delivered to the Secretary of State
for filing pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act
must be signed as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise
provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, a record signed on
behalf of a limited liability company must be signed by a person authorized
by the company.

(2)
A limited liability company's initial certificate of organization must be
signed by at least one person acting as an organizer.

(3) A record filed on behalf of
a dissolved limited liability company that has no members must be signed by
the person winding up the company's activities under subsection (c) of section
21-148 or a person appointed under subsection (d) of such section to wind
up those activities.

(4)
A statement of cancellation under subdivision (d)(2) of section 21-117 must
be signed by each organizer that signed the initial certificate of organization,
but a personal representative of a deceased or incompetent organizer may sign
in the place of the decedent or incompetent.

(5) A statement of denial by a person
under section 21-128 must be signed by that person.

(6) Any other record must be signed
by the person on whose behalf the record is delivered to the Secretary of
State.

(b)
Any record filed under the act may be signed by an agent.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 19.